Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.390

Administrator—Appointment—Delegation of duties—Term.

The director shall appoint a competent person to administer this chapter, who shall be designated the administrator. The director shall delegate to the administrator such powers, subject to the authority of the director, as may be necessary to carry out this chapter. The administrator shall hold office at the pleasure of the director.

[ 1986 c 14 s 16.]